Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1241.05
Personal watercraft; towing; when permitted.

A person shall not operate a personal watercraft on the waters of this state to tow a person on water skis, kneeboards, inflatable crafts, or any other device unless the personal watercraft is designed to accommodate more than one person and the personal watercraft is recommended by the manufacturer to tow such devices.

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 106.